Utah statutes.
53A-11-503.   Requirement of birth certificate for enrollment of students --
Procedures.
(1)  Upon enrollment of a student for the first time in a particular school,
that school shall notify in writing the person enrolling the student that
within 30 days he must provide either a certified copy of the student's birth
certificate, or other reliable proof of the student's identity and age,
together with an affidavit explaining the inability to produce a copy of the
birth certificate.
(2) (a)  Upon the failure of a person enrolling a student to comply with
Subsection (1), the school shall notify that person in writing that unless he
complies within 10 days the case shall be referred to the local law
enforcement authority for investigation.
(b)  If compliance is not obtained within that 10 day period, the school shall
refer the case to the division.
(3)  The school shall immediately report to the division any affidavit
received pursuant to this subsection which appears inaccurate or suspicious.
